Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0176.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of state police for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 3.0 Full-time equated classified positions 3,849.0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,015,686,700 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 29,030,200 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATIONS $ 986,656,500 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 101,314,700 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 5,035,600 Total private revenues 35,000 Total other state restricted revenues 192,336,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 687,935,200 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Full-time equated unclassified positions 3.0 Full-time equated classified positions 154.0 Unclassified salaries--FTEs 3.0 $ 1,338,200 Department services--FTEs 39.0 10,133,000 Departmentwide 53,324,700 Executive direction--FTEs 46.0 8,950,000 Mobile office and system support--FTEs 39.0 7,437,400 Professional development bureau--FTEs 30.0 10,557,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 91,740,800 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of transportation, state trunkline fund 41,100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 IDG from department of treasury, casino gaming fees 423,700 IDG, training academy charges 207,700 IDT - auto theft funds 1,500 IDT - truck safety fund 54,700 Federal revenues: DHS 32,400 DOJ 12,800 DOJ, interest bearing 9,900 DOT 2,253,300 Federal indirect funds 2,516,300 Special revenue funds: Local - AFIS fees 100 Local - LEIN fees 800 Local - reimbursed services 300 Local - school bus revenue 7,200 Total local revenues 8,400 Auto theft prevention fund 31,200 Criminal justice information center service fees 2,720,700 Drunk driving prevention and training fund 472,500 Forensic science reimbursement fees 52,000 Hazardous materials training center fees 50,900 Highway safety fund 268,600 Marihuana regulatory fund 267,400 Michigan justice training fund 3,700 Michigan merit award trust fund 16,500 Motor carrier fees 355,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Narcotics-related forfeiture revenue 400 Nuclear plant emergency planning reimbursement 23,900 Precision driving track fees 800 Reimbursed services 300 Secondary road patrol and training fund 100 Sex offenders registration fund 800 State forensic laboratory fund 90,400 State police administrator and coordinator 911 fund 25,800 State police service fees 400 State services fee fund 216,300 Tobacco tax revenue 117,300 Traffic law enforcement and safety fund 498,600 Truck driver safety fund 1,600 Vehicle sales proceeds 650,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 80,313,100 Sec. 103. LAW ENFORCEMENT Full-time equated classified positions 599.0 Biometrics and identification--FTEs 60.0 $ 12,267,700 Criminal justice information center--FTEs 154.0 29,906,500 Forensic science--FTEs 281.0 51,715,800 Grants and community services--FTEs 46.0 24,775,500 Office of school safety--FTEs 6.0 2,392,800 State 911 administration--FTEs 5.0 1,150,500 Training operations--FTEs 47.0 10,743,800 Trooper recruit school onboarding, training, and outfitting 5,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 137,952,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of state 418,900 IDG from department of transportation, state trunkline fund 776,400 IDG, training academy charges 2,827,300 IDT - Michigan justice training fund 750,000 Federal revenues: DOJ 15,284,900 DOJ, interest bearing 4,018,100 DOT 668,900 Special revenue funds: Local - SRMS fees 919,200 Total local revenues 919,200 Private donations 20,000 Auto theft prevention fund 9,008,800 Criminal justice information center service fees 25,586,800 Drunk driving prevention and training fund 200,800 Forensic science reimbursement fees 1,023,700 Motor carrier fees 145,600 Precision driving track fees 346,900 Sex offenders registration fund 396,100 State forensic laboratory fund 767,600 State police administrator and coordinator 911 fund 1,150,500 State services fee fund 8,335,900 Student safety fund 250,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Traffic crash revenue 588,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 64,467,900 Sec. 104. MICHIGAN COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT STANDARDS Full-time equated classified positions 27.0 De-escalation training $ 500,000 In-service training--FTEs 7.0 18,271,100 Justice training grants 10,000,000 Public safety officers benefit fund--FTE 1.0 303,000 Standards and training--FTEs 19.0 4,060,800 Training only to local units 855,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 33,989,900 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOJ 280,200 Special revenue funds: Law enforcement officers training fund 25,300 Marihuana regulatory fund 3,390,100 Michigan justice training fund 10,000,000 Private security licensing fees 5,000 Retired law enforcement officer safety fund 25,000 Secondary road patrol and training fund 855,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 19,409,300 Sec. 105. FIELD SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 2,426.0 Investigative services--FTEs 148.5 $ 44,262,500 Post operations--FTEs 2,247.5 465,928,900 Secure cities partnership--FTEs 30.0 10,643,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 520,835,200 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of treasury, casino gaming fees 6,907,500 IDT - auto theft funds 1,163,200 IDG from department of transportation, state trunkline fund 2,100 Federal revenues: DOJ 4,689,000 DOT 2,152,000 Federal forfeiture revenues 544,100 Federal investigations - reimbursed services 4,077,500 Total federal revenues 11,462,600 Special revenue funds: Local - reimbursed services 1,259,000 Bottle bill enforcement fund 786,100 Highway safety fund 10,524,700 Marihuana regulation fund 3,447,000 Marihuana regulatory fund 2,703,400 Michigan merit award trust fund 866,400 Narcotics-related forfeiture revenue 1,548,400 Nonnarcotic forfeiture revenue 50,600 Rental of department aircraft 900 State police service fees 6,444,000 State services fee fund 1,028,600 Tobacco tax revenue 5,687,900 Traffic law enforcement and safety fund 28,164,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Trooper school recruitment fund 5,073,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 433,714,700 Sec. 106. SPECIALIZED SERVICES Full-time equated classified positions 643.0 Commercial vehicle enforcement--FTEs 211.0 $ 40,483,400 Emergency management and homeland security--FTEs 64.0 17,399,800 Hazardous materials programs--FTEs 25.0 23,675,000 Highway safety planning--FTEs 25.0 20,554,000 Intelligence operations--FTEs 229.0 36,790,200 Secondary road patrol program--FTE 1.0 15,008,600 Special operations--FTEs 88.0 21,909,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 175,820,500 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of transportation, state trunkline fund 12,761,100 IDG from department of treasury, public safety answer point training 911 fund 100,000 IDT - truck safety fund 2,074,300 Federal revenues: DHS 32,287,700 DOT 31,527,200 Special revenue funds: Local - school bus revenue 1,897,300 Private donations 15,000 Bottle bill enforcement fund 230,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Criminal justice information center service fees 472,200 Hazardous materials training center fees 749,700 Marihuana regulation fund 257,100 Marihuana regulatory fund 390,000 Motor carrier fees 9,202,900 Nuclear plant emergency planning reimbursement 2,448,800 Reimbursed services 1,855,100 Rental of departmental aircraft 51,500 Secondary road patrol and training fund 15,008,600 State police dispatch operator 911 fund 681,900 Truck driver safety fund 3,976,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 59,834,000 Sec. 107. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY Information technology services and projects $ 30,347,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 30,347,600 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of transportation, state trunkline fund 364,700 IDG from department of treasury, casino gaming fees 122,800 IDG, training academy charges 11,500 IDT - auto theft funds 4,300 IDT - truck safety fund 17,400 Federal revenues: DHS 119,400 DOJ 580,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 DOT 260,600 Special revenue funds: Local - AFIS fees 80,000 Local - LEIN fees 851,300 Local - school bus revenue 20,400 Auto theft prevention fund 6,200 Criminal justice information center service fees 10,439,900 Drunk driving prevention and training fund 3,600 Forensic science reimbursement fees 76,500 Highway safety fund 92,400 Marihuana regulatory fund 773,700 Michigan merit award trust fund 3,400 Motor carrier fees 420,500 Nuclear plant emergency planning reimbursement 12,800 Sex offenders registration fund 228,400 State forensic laboratory fund 113,000 State police administrator and coordinator 911 fund 7,200 State police dispatch operator 911 fund 68,900 State services fee fund 84,400 Tobacco tax revenue 21,400 Traffic crash revenue 246,900 Traffic law enforcement and safety fund 119,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 15,196,100 Sec. 108. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Public safety academy assistance program $ 10,000,000 Public safety heroes program 1,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Disaster and emergency contingency fund 10,000,000 Law enforcement training for communication with limited English speaking communities and those deaf and hard of hearing 500,000 Cold case investigations 1,000,000 Crimestoppers 100 Okay2Say 1,000,000 Statewide fentanyl enforcement 1,000,000 Michigan public safety critical incident mapping grant 500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 25,000,100 Appropriated from: Community infrastructure fund 10,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 15,000,100 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year 2025-2026 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $880,271,200.00 and state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $61,441,500.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE Disaster and emergency contingency fund $ 10,000,000 In-service training ?14,586,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Justice training grants 10,000,000 Public safety academy assistance program 10,000,000 Secondary road patrol program 15,000,000 Law enforcement communication training 500,000 Training only to local units 855,500 Michigan public safety critical incident mapping grant 500,000 TOTAL $ 61,441,500 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. As used in this part and part 1: (a) "AFIS" means the automated fingerprint identification system. (b) "CJIS" means Criminal Justice Information Systems. (c) "Department" means the department of state police. (d) "DHS" means the United States Department of Homeland Security. (e) "Director" means the director of the department. (f) "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid. (g) "DOJ" means the United States Department of Justice. (h) "DOT" means the United States Department of Transportation. (i) "DTMB" means the department of technology, management, and budget. (j) "FTE" means full-time equated. (k) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant. (l) "LEIN" means the law enforcement information network. (m) "MCOLES" means the Michigan commission on law enforcement 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 standards created in section 3 of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.603. (n) "SIGMA" means the statewide integrated governmental management application. (o) "SRMS" means the state records management system. (p) "Standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on state police, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. Sec. 204. The department shall use the internet to fulfill the reporting requirements of this part. This requirement includes transmitting reports to the standard report recipients and any other required recipients by email and posting the reports on an internet site. Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1: (a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are available. (b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of comparable quality. (d) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 that are manufactured in facilities that employ union members. Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action against an employee of the department for communicating with a member of the legislature or a legislative staff, unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is exercising its authority as provided by law. Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, the department shall prepare a report on out-of-state travel expenses not later than January 1 of each year. The report must list all travel by classified and unclassified employees outside this state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or in part with funds appropriated in the department's budget. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees. The report must include all of the following information: (a) The dates of each travel occurrence. (b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel occurrence and the proportion funded with state general fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal revenues, and other revenues. Sec. 208. The department shall not use funds appropriated in part 1 to hire a person to provide legal services that are the responsibility of the attorney general. This section does not apply to legal services for bonding activities or to outside services that the attorney general authorizes. Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state budget office shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees. Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated under this subsection are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. (2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $4,000,000.00 for state restricted contingency authorization. Authorized funds are not available for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393. Sec. 211. The department shall cooperate with the DTMB to maintain a searchable website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for the department: (a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category. (b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit. (c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor, including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and payment description. (d) The number of active department employees by job classification. (e) Job specifications and wage rates. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate with the state budget office to provide an annual report on estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees. Sec. 214. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government resources, programs, or facilities. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or interfere with the duties of a local health officer. Sec. 215. To the extent permissible under the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director shall take all reasonable steps to ensure that geographically-disadvantaged business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract with geographically-disadvantaged business enterprises for services or supplies, or both. As used in this section, "geographically-disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-01. Sec. 216. On a quarterly basis, the department shall report the following information to the standard report recipients: (a) The number of FTE positions in pay status by type of staff and civil service classification. (b) A comparison by line item of the number of FTE positions 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 authorized from funds appropriated in part 1 to the actual number of FTE positions employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. Sec. 219. The department shall receive and retain copies of all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department shall follow federal and state guidelines for short-term and long-term retention of records. The department may electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required by federal or state guidelines. Sec. 220. Not later than April 1, the department shall report on each specific policy change made to implement a public act affecting the department that was enacted and took effect during the previous calendar year. The department shall submit the report to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees and the joint committee on administrative rules. Sec. 222. To the extent permissible, the department shall not expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted. Sec. 223. (1) General fund appropriations in part 1 shall not be expended for items if federal funding or private grant funding is available for the same expenditures. (2) If the department is required to make a reduction in expenditures under section 395(1) or (2) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1395, for any appropriation under this part or part 1, the department must notify the standard report recipients not later than 10 days after the reduction. The notification must include, but not be limited to, the following: (a) A description of the fund source that is insufficient to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 support the expenditures being reduced and the amount of the reduction. (b) A description of the cause for the reduction, if any such cause is known. (c) A description of the functions of state government or services to residents that will be affected by the reduction. Sec. 224. The department shall provide biannual reports to the standard report recipients that include the following data: (a) A list of major work projects, including the status of each project. (b) The department's financial status, featuring a report of budgeted versus actual expenditures by part 1 line item including a year-end projection of budget requirements. If projected department budget requirements exceed the allocated budget, the report must include a plan to reduce overall expenses while still satisfying specified service level requirements. (c) A report on the performance metrics cited or information required to be reported in this part, reasons for nonachievement of metric targets, and proposed corrective actions. Sec. 225. Based on the availability of federal funding and demonstrated need, as indicated by applications submitted to the state court administrative office, the department shall provide $1,500,000.00 in Byrne justice assistance grant program funding to the judiciary by interdepartmental grant. Sec. 226. The department shall notify the subcommittees, the chairpersons of the senate and house appropriations committees, and the senate and house fiscal agencies when it recommends to close or consolidate any state police post. The notification must include a local and state impact study of the proposed post closure or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 consolidation. Sec. 227. If the department presents a plan to the state employer to privatize, the department shall submit a complete project plan to the subcommittees and the senate and house fiscal agencies. The plan must include the criteria under which the privatization initiative will be evaluated. The evaluation must be completed and submitted to the subcommittees and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 30 months. Sec. 228. (1) When the department provides contractual services to a local unit of government, the department shall be reimbursed for all costs incurred in providing the services. (2) The department shall define service cost models for those services requiring reimbursement. (3) Contractual services provided to an entity other than a local unit of government may be provided by department personnel, but only on an overtime basis outside the normal work schedule of the personnel. All costs incurred in providing the services are eligible for reimbursement. (4) This section does not apply to services provided to state agencies. (5) Revenues received for contractual or reimbursed services in excess of the appropriations in part 1 are appropriated and may be received and expended by the department for the purposes for which the funds are received. (6) If additional authorization is approved in SIGMA by the state budget office under this section, the department shall notify the subcommittees and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and funding source of the additional authorization, the date 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of its approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended. Sec. 229. The department shall serve as an active liaison between the DTMB and state, local, regional, and federal public safety agencies on matters pertaining to the Michigan public safety communications system and shall report user issues to the DTMB. Sec. 230. The department may establish and collect fees for publications, videos, conferences, workshops, and related materials. Fees collected under this section must be used to offset expenditures for costs of the publications, videos, workshops, conferences, and related materials. The department shall not collect fees under this section that exceed the cost of the expenditures. Sec. 231. (1) The department may accept monetary and nonmonetary gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants from any private or public source to support, in whole or in part, a departmental function or program. The department shall expend or use the gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants accepted under this subsection for the purposes designated by the private or public source, if the purpose is specified. (2) Revenue collected by the department under this section that is unexpended and unencumbered must not lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year. (3) Private revenues received under this section that exceed the appropriations in part 1 are appropriated and may be received and expended by the department for the purposes for which the funds are received. (4) If additional authorization is approved in SIGMA by the state budget office under this section, the department shall notify the subcommittees and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and funding source of the additional authorization, the date of the approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended. Sec. 232. (1) Federal revenues authorized by and available from the federal government in excess of the appropriations in part 1 that are not otherwise authorized under section 704(3) are appropriated and may be received and expended by the department for purposes authorized under state law and subject to federal requirements. The total amount of federal revenues that may be received and expended under this section must not exceed $15,000,000.00. (2) The department shall notify the subcommittees and the senate and house fiscal agencies before expending federal revenues received and appropriated under subsection (1). (3) If additional authorization is approved in SIGMA by the state budget office under this section, the department shall notify the subcommittees and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and funding source of the additional authorization, the date of its approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended. Sec. 233. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that the department shall take all steps necessary to protect the data and privacy of citizens who are not the focus of a departmental investigation and to protect personal information from unauthorized access or misuse. The protection required under this subsection includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) Requiring vendors or service providers to protect data shared with them. (b) Ensuring that when personal data is collected, but no 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 longer utilized by the department, that reasonable steps be taken to securely destroy records containing personal information when it is to be discarded so that the information is rendered indecipherable and is not sold for marketing or other purposes. (2) The department shall provide written notification to any data subject whose sensitive personal information is accessed or acquired by an unauthorized person. Sec. 234. A law enforcement officer funded under part 1 shall not be required to issue a predetermined or specified number of citations for violations of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or of a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to the provisions of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, including parking or standing violations. A law enforcement officer's performance evaluation system must not require a predetermined or specified number of citations to be issued. Sec. 235. The department, in collaboration with the department of health and human services and the department of education, shall advise on initiatives in schools and other educational organizations that include, but are not limited to, training for educators, teachers, and other personnel in school settings for all of the following: (a) Utilization of trauma-informed practices. (b) Age-appropriate education and information on human trafficking. (c) Age-appropriate education and information on sexual abuse prevention. Sec. 237. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the director shall establish and maintain local headquarters in various places, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and may do so by agreement, lease, or otherwise, as provided under section 7 of 1935 PA 59, MCL 28.7. Sec. 239. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. A department or agency receiving an appropriation under this part or part 1 must notify the standard report recipients if an appropriation of funds described under this section is projected to lapse. Sec. 250. (1) For any grant program or project funded in part 1 intended for a single recipient organization or unit of local government, the grant program or project is for a public purpose and the department shall follow procurement statutes of this state, including any bidding requirements, unless the department can fully validate, through information detailed in this part or public supporting documents, both of the following: (a) The specific organization or unit of local government that will receive or administer the funds. (b) How the funds will be administered and expended. (2) To be eligible to receive a grant described in subsection (1), both of the following must occur: (a) A recipient must submit the application under subsection (3) not later than 60 days after the effective date of this act. (b) A recipient must be 1 of the following: (i) A unit of local government, as that term is defined in section 115 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1115. (ii) An institution of higher education. (iii) A state agency, as that term is defined in section 115 of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1115. (iv) An entity registered with the department of licensing and regulatory affairs or the department of attorney general that has been in existence for at least the 12 months preceding the effective date of this act. (v) Another entity that can demonstrate, through state or federal tax filings or other state or federal government records, that it has been in existence for at least the 12 months preceding the effective date of this act. (3) Notwithstanding any other conditions or requirements for direct appropriation grants, the department shall work with the state budget office to perform at least all of the following activities to administer the grants described in subsection (1): (a) Develop a standard application process using the electronic submission portal developed by the state budget office, grantee reporting requirements, and any other necessary documentation, including sponsorship information as specified under subsection (4). If the electronic submission portal identified in this subdivision is not fully functional by 60 days after the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall ensure that the standard application process and form are available promptly and paper submission is acceptable. The state budget office shall promptly submit application material received to the department for departmental review. (b) Establish a process to review, complete, and execute a grant agreement with a grant recipient. The department shall not execute a grant agreement unless all necessary documentation has been submitted and reviewed. (c) Verify to the extent possible that a grant recipient will 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 use funds for a public purpose that serves the economic prosperity, health, safety, or general welfare of the residents of this state. (d) Review and verify all necessary information to ensure the grant recipient is reasonably able to execute the grant agreement, perform its fiduciary duty, and comply with all applicable state and federal statutes. The department may deduct the cost of background checks and any other efforts performed as part of this verification from the amount of the designated grant award. (e) Establish a standard timeline to review all documents submitted by grant recipients and provide a response within 45 business days stating whether submitted documents by a grant recipient are sufficient or in need of additional information. If additional information is needed, the 60-day deadline in subsection (2) is considered to have been met, if a sponsor has been identified for that grant. If a grant recipient does not provide information sufficient to execute a grant agreement not later than 60 days after being notified by the department of grant approval, the department shall return funds associated with the grant to the state treasury. (f) Make an initial disbursement of up to 50% of the grant to the grant recipient not later than 60 days after a grant agreement has been executed. Disbursements must be consistent with part II, chapter 10, section 200 of the Financial Management Guide. (g) Disburse the funds remaining after the initial disbursement under subdivision (f) per the grant disbursement schedule in the executed grant agreement on a reimbursement basis after the grantee has provided sufficient documentation, as determined by the department, to verify that expenditures were made in accordance with the project purpose. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (4) The identification and process for the identification and sponsorship of a grant described in subsection (1) is as follows: (a) Not later than the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall provide an initial list of grants that require legislative sponsorship to the legislature and shall make public an initial list of grants that likely will be sponsored by the department or by the state budget office. (b) A sponsor of a grant described in subsection (1) must be a legislator, the department, or the state budget office. (c) A legislative sponsor must be identified through a letter submitted by that legislator's office to the department and state budget director containing the name of the grant recipient, the intended amount of the grant, a certification from that legislator that the grant is for a public purpose, and the specific citation of the section and subsection of the public act that authorizes the grant, as applicable. (d) Within 10 business days after the effective date of this act, the senate and house of representatives shall compile an initial list of legislative grant sponsors for their respective chambers and submit those compiled lists to the state budget office and the department, and the state budget office shall identify department- or state budget office-sponsored grants. The state budget director may grant an extension of this deadline of not more than 30 days on a case-by-case basis. The state budget office shall make the compiled lists public within 14 business days after the effective date of this act. (e) Not later than 60 days after the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall publish a final list of grants requiring sponsorship. If a legislative sponsor is not identified 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 within 60 days after the effective date of this act, the department shall do 1 of the following: (i) Identify the department or the state budget office as the sponsor. (ii) Decline to execute the grant agreement and lapse the associated funds at the end of the fiscal year. (f) At any point during the fiscal year, legislative grant sponsors may be added to a grant request. (5) An executed grant agreement under this section between the department and a grant recipient must include at least all of the following: (a) All necessary identifying information for the grant recipient, including any tax and financial information for the department to administer funds under this section. (b) A description of the project for which the grant funds will be expended, including tentative timelines and the estimated budget. The department shall not reimburse expenditures that are outside of the project purpose, as stated in the executed grant agreement, from appropriations in part 1. The grantee shall return to the treasury any interest in excess of $1,000.00 earned on the grant funds while unexpended and in possession of the grantee. (c) Unless otherwise specified in department policy, a requirement that funds appropriated for the grants described in subsection (1) may be used only for expenditures that occur on or after the effective date of this act. (d) A requirement for reporting by the grant recipient to the department and the legislative sponsor that provides the status of the project and an accounting of all funds expended by the grant recipient, as determined by the department. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (e) A claw-back provision that allows the department of treasury to recoup or otherwise collect any funds that are declined, unspent, or otherwise misused. (f) The signed legislative sponsorship letter required under subsection (4), incorporated into the grant agreement and included as an appendix or attachment. (g) If a grant recipient has provided information sufficient to execute a grant agreement, the state budget office shall promptly transmit that information to the department for the department's review of the grant application. If a grant recipient has provided information sufficient to execute a grant agreement within 60 days after the effective date of this act, but the grant application needs technical fixes or additional legislative action, as identified by the state budget office, the 60-day deadline in this subdivision is considered to have been met, if a sponsor has been identified for that grant. If a grant recipient does not provide information sufficient to execute a grant agreement not later than 60 days after being notified by the department of grant approval, the department shall return funds associated with the grant to the state treasury. (6) If appropriate to improve the administration or oversight of a grant described in subsection (1), the department may adopt a memorandum of understanding with another state department to perform the required duties under this section. (7) A grant recipient shall respond to all reasonable information requests from the department related to grant expenditures and retain grant records for not less than 7 years, and the grant may be subject to monitoring, site visits, and audits as determined by the department. The grant agreement required under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 this section must include signed assurance by the chief executive officer or other executive officer of the grant recipient that the requirements of this subsection will be met. (8) The grant recipient shall expend all funds awarded and complete all projects not later than September 30, 2030. If at that time any unexpended funds remain, the grant recipient shall return those funds to the state treasury. (9) Any funds that are granted to a state department are appropriated in that department for the purpose of the intended grant. (10) The state budget director may, on a case-by-case basis, extend the deadline in subsection (8) on request by a grant recipient if a sponsor has been identified for the grant. The state budget director shall notify the chairs of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees not later than 5 days after an extension is granted. (11) By March 1 of the current fiscal year, the state budget office shall post a report in a publicly accessible location on its website. The report must list the grant recipient, project purpose, and location of the project for each grant described in subsection (1), the status of funds allocated and disbursed under the grant agreement, and the legislative sponsor, if applicable. After March 1, the state budget office shall update the report monthly and shall post the updated report each month. The state budget office shall include in the report the most comprehensive information the office has available at the time of posting for grants awarded. The state budget office may compile the information required in this report across all departments. The department shall assist the state budget office with the compilation of the report required 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 under this subsection. (12) On request, beginning 75 days after the effective date of this act, the state budget office shall release information received for grant applications. (13) As applicable, the legislative sponsor of a grant described in subsection (1) shall not sponsor a grant, or ask another legislator to sponsor a grant, if there is a conflict of interest related to the grant recipient. (14) If the department reasonably determines that the funds allocated for an executed grant agreement under this section were misused or that use of the funds was misrepresented by the grant recipient, the department shall not award any additional funds under the executed grant agreement and shall refer the grant for review following internal audit protocols. Sec. 251. (1) Within 10 days after the effective date of this act, the department must provide a report to the standard report recipients containing the following information: (a) A list of any sections in this part that the department determines to be unenforceable, with a detailed legal rationale for those determinations, as applicable. (b) If a determination under subdivision (a) would affect the operations of a program or programs within the department, the department must report the estimated difference in cost between the policy outlined in the section determined to be unenforceable and the policy the department intends to pursue. (2) The department may coordinate with the executive office of the governor or other state departments or agencies to compile a statewide report for any departments or agencies required to submit a report substantially similar to the report described under 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subsection (1). Sec. 252. The department must provide a quarterly report to the standard report recipients detailing federal policy changes that do, or are expected to do, any of the following: (a) Affect the operations of the department. (b) Affect an industry, community, population, or other group regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the department. (c) Affect regulations that currently protect the public to the extent that the regulations affect an industry, community, population, or other group regulated or served by, or that otherwise engages with, the department. (d) Create a regulatory gap that could negatively impact the public. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Sec. 301. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the professional development bureau, the department may provide or obtain the following training: (a) Training that directly relates to the individual's job description and role within the department. (b) Professional development training. (c) Training that provides the individual with the ability to seek expanded opportunities within the department. (d) Advanced education training. (e) De-escalation training. (2) Not later than January 1, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations committees that includes the following 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 information about the funds appropriated in part 1 for the professional development bureau: (a) The training courses that the department's employees completed. (b) If a training course is developed by the department, a description of that course's curriculum and its purpose. (c) The number of the department's employees who have received and completed training pursuant to this section. Sec. 302. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall, in collaboration with the department of civil rights and MCOLES, provide the following training to local police departments or officers free of charge: (a) Cultural awareness and competency. (b) Tolerance, diversity, and implicit bias. (c) Conflict management and de-escalation. (d) Use of force on vulnerable individuals, including children, individuals with disabilities, individuals with unmet mental health needs, individuals under the influence of substances, and pregnant individuals. (e) Mental health and wellness for law enforcement officers. (2) The training provided under subsection (1) may be offered online in order to facilitate easy access and may be given by department staff, contractors, or external vendors. (3) On a quarterly basis, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on the number of officers, by police department, that received training under this section. LAW ENFORCEMENT SERVICES Sec. 401. (1) The department shall develop and deliver 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 professional, innovative, and quality training that supports the enforcement and public safety efforts of the criminal justice community. (2) The department shall provide performance data, as provided under section 224, for days of training being conducted by the academy. (3) The department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients within 60 days of the conclusion of any trooper, motor carrier, or state properties security recruit school. The report must include all of the following: (a) The number of veterans and the number of MCOLES-certified police officers who were admitted to and the number who graduated from the recruit school. (b) The total number of recruits who were admitted to the recruit school, the number of recruits who graduated from the recruit school, and the location at which each of these recruits is assigned. (4) The department shall distribute and review course evaluations to ensure that quality training is provided. Sec. 402. (1) In accordance with applicable state and federal laws and regulations, the department shall maintain and ensure compliance with CJIS databases and applications in the support of public safety and law enforcement communities. (2) The department shall improve the accuracy, timeliness, and completeness of criminal history information by conducting a minimum of 30 outreach activities targeted to criminal justice agencies. The department shall report the number of these outreach activities conducted, as provided under section 224. (3) The department shall provide for the compilation of crime 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 statistics consistent with the uniform crime reporting (UCR) program and the national incident-based report system (NIBRS). (4) The department shall provide for the compilation and evaluation of traffic crash reports and the maintenance of the state accident data collection system. (5) The department shall make individual traffic crash reports available for a fee of $15.00 per incident. The department may also sell an extract of electronic traffic crash data for a fee of $0.25 per incident, provided that the name, address, and any other personal identifying information have been excluded. (6) By March 1, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients detailing the number of traffic crash reports provided, the amount of revenue collected, and all expenditures incurred for activities under subsection (5) in the preceding fiscal year. The report must include an analysis of whether revenue from department activities under subsection (5) is sufficient to offset all costs incurred for those activities and must provide information regarding any deficit or surplus of revenue. (7) In accordance with applicable state and federal laws and regulations, the department shall provide for the maintenance and dissemination of criminal history records and juvenile records, including to the extent necessary to exchange criminal history records information with the Federal Bureau of Investigation and other states through the interstate identification index, the National Crime Information Center, and other federal CJIS databases and indices. (8) The department shall, in accordance with applicable state and federal laws, provide for the maintenance of records, including 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 criminal history records regarding firearms licensure, as provided under 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.421 to 28.435. (9) The department shall provide information on the number of background checks processed through the internet criminal history access tool (ICHAT), as provided in section 224. (10) The following unexpended and unencumbered revenues deposited into the criminal justice information center service fees must not lapse to the general fund, but must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year: (a) Fees for fingerprinting and criminal record checks and name-based criminal record checks under 1935 PA 120, MCL 28.271 to 28.274. (b) Fees for application and licensing for initial and renewal concealed pistol licenses under 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.421 to 28.435. (c) Fees for searching, copying, and providing public records under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (d) Revenue from other sources, including, but not limited to, investment and interest earnings. (11) Unexpended and unencumbered revenue generated by state records management system fees must not lapse to the general fund, but must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 403. (1) The department shall provide forensic testing and analysis/profiling of DNA evidence to aid in law enforcement investigations in this state. (2) The department shall ensure its ability to maintain accreditation by a federally designated accrediting agency, as provided under 34 USC 12592. (3) The department shall provide forensic science services 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 with an average turnaround time of 55 days, assuming an annual caseload volume commensurate with the average annual caseload received by the forensic science division during the preceding 5 fiscal years, and shall work to achieve a goal of a 30-day average turnaround time across all forensic science disciplines. (4) The department shall provide the following data as provided in section 224: (a) The average turnaround time for processing forensic evidence across all disciplines. (b) Forensic laboratory staffing levels, including scientists in training, and vacancies. (c) The number of backlogged cases in each discipline. Sec. 404. (1) The biometrics and identification division shall maintain and manage the automated biometric identification system, statewide network of agency photographs, and combined offender DNA index system biometric databases. (2) The department shall provide data on the number of 10-print and palm-print submissions to the database, as provided in section 224. (3) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to have a 28-day average wait time for scheduling a polygraph examination, assuming an annual caseload received commensurate with the average annual caseload received during the preceding 5 fiscal years, with a goal of achieving a 15-day average wait time. (4) If changes are made to the department's protocol for retaining and purging DNA analysis samples and records, the department shall post a copy of the protocol changes on the department's website. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 405. Not later than December 1, the department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (a) Sexual assault kit analysis backlog at the beginning of the previous fiscal year. (b) The number of sexual assault kits collected or submitted for analysis during the previous fiscal year. (c) The number of sexual assault kits analyzed and the number of associated DNA profiles created and uploaded during the previous fiscal year. (d) Sexual assault kit analysis backlog at the end of the previous fiscal year. (e) The average turnaround time to analyze sexual assault kits and to create and upload associated DNA profiles for the previous fiscal year. Sec. 406. The department shall provide administrative support for the following grant and community service programs: (a) The operations of the automobile theft prevention authority. (b) Administration of the Edward Byrne memorial justice assistance program and other grant programs, including the department's community policing efforts. (c) Administration of the office of school safety. (d) Administration and outreach of the OK2SAY program. Sec. 407. Not later than March 30, the office of school safety shall provide a school safety report to the legislature and the senate and house fiscal agencies that must include reports of both of the following: (a) The incidents of school violence or threats reported to 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the state police by local law enforcement or local school districts, or received through the Michigan incident crime report (MICR). (b) OK2SAY-based incidences and activities. (c) Based upon an evaluation of school safety incidents, recommendations on best practices, and other safety measures to ensure school safety in this state. Sec. 408. The unexpended and unencumbered general fund/general purpose funds appropriated in part 1 for trooper recruit school onboarding, training, and outfitting must not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year but must be deposited into the trooper recruit school fund created under section 819b of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.819b. MICHIGAN COMMISSION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT STANDARDS Sec. 501. (1) MCOLES shall establish standards for the selection, employment, training, education, licensing, and licensure revocation of all law enforcement officers and provide the basic law enforcement training curriculum for law enforcement training academy programs statewide. (2) MCOLES shall maintain staffing and resources necessary to update law enforcement standards within 120 days of the enactment date of any new legislation. (3) From the funds appropriated in part 1, MCOLES, by March 1, shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes a summary of MCOLES activities during the prior calendar year. The report required under this subsection must include, but is not limited to, both of the following information: (a) An account of the distribution of training funds 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 administered by MCOLES. (b) A list of recipients that received training funds under subdivision (a) and the amount received by each recipient and for what purpose it was used. Sec. 502. The general fund/general purpose funds appropriated in part 1 for the public safety officers benefit fund must be deposited into the public safety officers benefit fund created in section 3 of the public safety officers benefit act, 2004 PA 46, MCL 28.633. The general fund/general purpose funds appropriated in part 1 for the public safety officers benefit fund and deposited into the public safety officers benefit fund in accordance with section 3 of the public safety officers benefit act, 2004 PA 46, MCL 28.633, and this section should be used to increase the $25,000.00 benefit payment made to a recipient who dies or is permanently and totally disabled during the fiscal year under section 4 of the public safety officers benefit act, 2004 PA 46, MCL 28.634, to $50,000.00. All funds in the public safety officers benefit fund are appropriated and available for expenditure in accordance with section 3 of the public safety officers benefit act, 2004 PA 46, MCL 28.633. Sec. 503. Funds appropriated in part 1 for in-service training must be deposited into the law enforcement officers training fund created in section 11(7) of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.611. All funds in the law enforcement officers training fund are appropriated and available for expenditure to support the implementation of required annual in-service training standards for all licensed law enforcement officers, in accordance with rules promulgated under section 11(2) of the Michigan commission on law enforcement 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.611. FIELD SERVICES Sec. 601. (1) Department enlisted personnel who are employed to enforce traffic laws as provided in section 629e of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.629e, are not prohibited from responding to crimes in progress or other emergency situations and are responsible for making every effort to protect all residents of this state. (2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to continually work to enhance traffic safety throughout this state and shall dedicate a minimum of 455,200 hours to statewide patrol, of which a minimum of 40,000 must be committed to distressed cities in this state. The department shall work to improve public safety efforts within distressed cities by enhancing data analysis capabilities and identifying crime trends and areas with high occurrence of crime. (3) The department shall report on the number of residence checks of registered sex offenders conducted, as provided under section 224. (4) The department shall submit a report to the standard report recipients on or before April 15 regarding the secure cities partnership during the previous calendar year. Sec. 602. (1) The department shall identify and apprehend criminals through criminal investigations in this state. (2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to provide a comparable number of hours investigating crimes as the average annual number provided during the preceding 5 fiscal years. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to annually meet or exceed a case clearance rate of 62%. (4) The department shall provide training opportunities to local law enforcement partners with the goal of increasing their knowledge of gambling laws, legal issues, opioid-related investigations, and other emerging law enforcement issues. (5) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to investigate the average annual number of opioid-related investigations conducted by multijurisdictional task forces and hometown security teams during the preceding 5 fiscal years. The department shall work to enhance investigative and drug interdiction efforts by enhancing data analysis capabilities and linking investigations among multijurisdictional task forces and hometown security teams. Sec. 603. (1) The department shall provide protection to this state, its economy, welfare, and vital state-sponsored programs through the prevention and suppression of organized smuggling of untaxed tobacco products in this state, through enforcement of the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL 205.421 to 205.436, and other laws pertaining to combating criminal activity in this state, and by maintaining a tobacco tax enforcement unit. (2) The department shall submit an annual report on December 1 to the standard report recipients and to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on general government that details expenditures and activities related to tobacco tax enforcement for the previous fiscal year. Sec. 604. (1) The department shall provide fire investigation training and investigative assistance to public safety agencies in this state. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to maintain readiness to respond appropriately to at least the average annual number of requests for fire investigation services that occurred during the preceding 5 fiscal years, and shall be available for call out statewide 100% of the time. Sec. 605. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department shall make an organized, strategic effort to recruit trooper school candidates and other new employees that mirror the diverse racial, religious, and cultural backgrounds that make up the communities in Michigan, including individuals who are Black, Jewish, Native American, LGBTQ+, Indian/Hindu, Hispanic, Arab/Muslim, and Asian and Pacific Islander. The department shall submit an annual report of these recruiting efforts, along with the status of the diversity of current racial, religious, and cultural backgrounds of those employed by the department to the subcommittees not later than April 15 of each year. (2) The department may use the funds appropriated in part 1 that represent attrition savings to offset the cost of recruiting efforts described under subsection (1). SPECIALIZED SERVICES Sec. 701. (1) The department shall operate the Michigan intelligence operations center for homeland security as this state's primary federally designated fusion center to receive, analyze, gather, and disseminate threat-related information among federal, state, local, tribal, and private sector partners. (2) The department shall ensure public safety by providing public and private sector partners with timely and accurate information regarding critical information key resource threats, as 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 reported to or discovered by the Michigan intelligence operations center for homeland security, and shall increase public awareness on how to report suspicious activity through website or telephone communications. (3) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to support the cyber section, including the Michigan cyber command center, the computer crimes unit, and the internet crimes against children task force. The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to complete the average annual number of cases completed by the computer crimes unit during the preceding 5 fiscal years. The computer crimes unit shall pursue process improvement initiatives to effectively utilize staff resources in providing investigatory assistance and evidentiary analysis for law enforcement and criminal justice agencies statewide. The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to complete the average annual casework that the Michigan cyber command center completed during the preceding 5 fiscal years. (4) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to provide digital forensic analysis services with a goal of decreasing backlogs of digital forensic analysis cases annually until the department maintains a 60-day turnaround time. Sec. 702. (1) The department shall provide specialized services in support of, and to enhance, local, state, and federal law enforcement operations within this state, in accordance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations. (2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to provide training to maintain readiness to respond appropriately to at least the average annual number of requests for specialty services which occurred during the preceding 5 fiscal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 years. (3) The canine unit shall be available for call out statewide 100% of the time. (4) The bomb squad unit shall be available for call out statewide 100% of the time. (5) The emergency support teams shall be available for call out statewide 100% of the time. (6) The marine services team shall be available for call out statewide 100% of the time. (7) Aviation services shall be available for call out statewide 100% of the time, unless prohibited by weather or unexpected mechanical breakdowns. (8) The department shall maintain the staff and resources necessary to provide security services at the State Capitol Complex facilities, the State Secondary Complex, and other state-owned or leased properties, as provided under section 6c of 1935 PA 59, MCL 28.6c. The department shall also maintain the staff and resources necessary to respond to emergencies at the State Capitol Complex, State Secondary Complex, House Office Building, Binsfeld Office Building, Townsend Parking Ramp, Roosevelt Parking Ramp, and other areas as directed. The department shall maintain a goal of annually conducting 35,000 property inspections of state owned and leased facilities. Sec. 703. (1) The department shall maintain commercial vehicle regulation, school bus inspections, and enforcement activities, including enforcement of requirements concerning size, weight, and load restrictions; operating authority; registration; fuel taxes; transportation of hazardous materials; new entrant operations; commercial driver licenses; and inspections pursuant to the federal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 motor carrier assistance program. (2) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to meet inspection goals consistent with the department's federal motor carrier assistance program activities. (3) Revenue collected under the motor carrier act, 1933 PA 254, MCL 475.1 to 479.42, must be expended in accordance with that act. Unexpended and unencumbered revenues must not lapse to the general fund but must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 704. (1) The department shall coordinate the mitigation, preparation, response, and recovery activities of municipal, county, state, and federal governments, and other governmental entities, for all hazards, disasters, and emergencies. (2) The state director of emergency management may expend money appropriated under part 1 to call on any agency or department of this state or any resource of this state to protect life or property or to provide for the health or safety of the population in any area of this state in which the governor proclaims a state of emergency or state of disaster under the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421. The state director of emergency management may expend the amounts the director considers necessary to accomplish these purposes. The director shall submit to the state budget director, as soon as possible, a complete report of all actions taken under the authority of this section. The report must contain, as a separate item, a statement of all money expended that is not reimbursable from federal funding. The state budget director shall review the expenditures and submit recommendations to the legislature in regard to any possible need for a supplemental appropriation. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the department may receive and expend money from local, private, federal, or state sources for the purpose of providing emergency management training to local or private interests and for the purpose of supporting emergency preparedness, response, recovery, and mitigation activity. If additional expenditure authorization in SIGMA is approved by the state budget office under this section, the department and the state budget office shall notify the subcommittees and the senate and house fiscal agencies within 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and source of the additional authorization, the date of its approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended under the authorization. ? (4) The department shall foster, promote, and maintain partnerships to protect this state and homeland from all hazards. (5) The department shall maintain the staffing and resources necessary to do all of the following: (a) Serve approximately 105 local emergency management preparedness programs and 88 local emergency planning committees in this state. (b) Operate and maintain the state's emergency operations center and provide command and control in support of emergency response services. (c) Maintain readiness, including training and equipment to respond to civil disorders and natural disasters commensurate with the capabilities of fiscal year 2010-2011. (d) Perform hazardous materials response training. (6) The department shall conduct a minimum of 3 training sessions to enhance safe response in the event of natural or 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 manmade incidents, emergencies, or disasters. (7) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated from the disaster and emergency contingency fund an amount necessary to cover costs related to any disaster or emergency as defined in the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421. Funds must be expended as provided under sections 18 and 19 of the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.418 and 30.419, and R 30.51 to R 30.61 of the Michigan Administrative Code. (8) If, in a particular month, expenditures are made from the disaster and emergency contingency fund, the department shall submit a report for that month to the senate and house fiscal agencies detailing the purpose of the expenditures. The monthly report required under this subsection must be submitted within 30 days after the end of the month during which funds from the disaster and emergency contingency fund were expended. (9) The department shall track and report on a biannual basis, as provided in section 224 of this part, the status of the department's assessment of critical infrastructure vulnerabilities, including the protection status of critical infrastructure items identified by the assessment. The department is not required to report any information that could compromise the security of any critical infrastructure. (10) Revenue collected by the department under this section for the emergency management and homeland security training center that is unexpended and unencumbered at the end of the fiscal year must not lapse to the general fund, but must be carried forward into the subsequent fiscal year. Sec. 705. The department shall provide for the planning, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 administration, and implementation of highway traffic safety programs to save lives and reduce injuries on roads in this state, in partnership with other public and private organizations. Sec. 706. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for the secondary road patrol program must be used to provide grants to sheriffs under the secondary road patrol program described under section 76 of 1846 RS 14, MCL 51.76. (2) The sheriffs' duties under the secondary road patrol program, as outlined in section 76(2) of 1846 RS 14, MCL 51.76, are to do all of the following: (a) Patrol and monitor traffic violations. (b) Enforce the criminal laws of this state, violations of which are observed by or brought to the attention of the sheriff's department while patrolling and monitoring secondary roads. (c) Investigate accidents involving motor vehicles. (d) Provide emergency assistance to persons on or near a highway or road the sheriff is patrolling and monitoring. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 801. The community infrastructure funds appropriated in part 1 for the disaster and emergency contingency fund must be deposited to the restricted disaster and emergency contingency fund created in section 18 of the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.418. Sec. 802. (1) From the 1-time funds appropriated in part 1 for law enforcement training for communication with limited English speaking communities and those deaf and hard of hearing, MCOLES shall ensure that training be provided to law enforcement officers to assist in their communication with members of the public who 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 experience a language barrier or may be hard of hearing or deaf. The training required under this subsection must be developed by an entity that is MCOLES approved in a manner prescribed by the commission and holds an oral transliteration certificate. Any training course provided for under this section must be certified by the international accreditors for continuing education and training. (2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for law enforcement training for communication with limited English speaking communities and those deaf and hard of hearing are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds must not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and must be available for expenditures for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a(1) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is the training of law enforcement officers. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing contracts with service providers. (c) The estimated cost of this project is $500,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date for the work project is September 30, 2030. Sec. 803. Funds appropriated in part 1 for cold case investigations must be allocated as follows: (a) $400,000.00 to the Michigan state police special investigation division and at least $250,000.00 of this allocation must be used to support cold case murder investigations in a city with a population greater than 110,000 and less than 115,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 according to the most recent federal decennial census. (b) $200.000.00 to the Michigan state police forensic science division. (c) $400,000.00 to 2 universities that have had a cold case program partnership with the department for over a year by October 1, 2024 and that provide workforce development training related to criminal investigation tactics, forensic science and law, and review of cold homicide and missing person cases. Funds disbursed under this subdivision must be distributed equally, $200,000.00 to each university, and used only for programmatic and operational expenses of the university's cold case training course program. Sec. 804. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for public safety academy assistance program, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Pay the salaries of training academy recruits from public safety agencies. (b) Pay the salaries of individuals who receive scholarships under subdivision (c). (c) Allocate funds to MCOLES to establish and administer a competitive scholarship program that provides police academy scholarships of up to $20,000.00 per recruit on a first-come, first-served basis to an individual in a public safety agency who meets the requirements of subsection (2) and any necessary requirements to enroll in a police academy program. (2) An individual must meet both of the following requirements to receive a scholarship under this section: (a) Have applied to at least 1 law enforcement basic training academy approved by MCOLES. (b) Have completed an interview and received approval for the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 scholarship from the public safety agency that the individual intends to serve. (3) For the purposes of this section, no more than 25 scholarships may be approved by a particular public safety agency. (4) MCOLES is authorized to use up to $140,000.00 for administration of the scholarship program established and administered by MCOLES under this section. (5) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for public safety academy assistance programs are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds must not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and must be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to provide salaries and scholarships for public safety recruits. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracts with vendors, or local partners. (c) The estimated cost of the project is $10,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2028. Sec. 805. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for public safety heroes program, the department shall use these funds for the costs of identifying and recognizing public safety workers that perform a significant act or service of special merit. Sec. 806. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for statewide fentanyl enforcement, the department shall expend those funds at its discretion to enhance the department's efforts to enforce the laws against the illegal use of fentanyl in the state. Sec. 807. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Michigan public safety critical incident mapping grant, the department shall create a grant program to assist counties in their development of critical incident mapping. An individual grant to a county must not exceed $25,000.00 and a county is only eligible to receive up to 3 individual grants. (2) A county that is awarded a grant under this section shall only use the funds to implement critical incident mapping that satisfies all of the following: (a) Is compatible with platforms and applications used by local, state, and federal public safety officials. (b) Does not require the purchase of additional software for use. (c) Is provided in a printable format. (d) Is verified for accuracy through a walk-through of a building and grounds. (e) Is oriented true north. (f) Includes accurate floor plans overlaid on or current aerial imagery of a building or floor plan. (g) Includes site-specific labeling that matches the structure of the building, including room labels, hallway names, external door or stairwell numbers, locations of hazards, key utility locations, key boxes, automated external defibrillators, and trauma kits. (h) Includes site-specific labeling that matches the building grounds, including parking areas, athletic fields, surrounding roads, and neighboring properties. (i) Includes a gridded overlay with x/y coordinates. (j) Includes information that best assists first responders in an emergency, including, but not limited to, the following 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 information: (i) Building numbers. (ii) Floors. (iii) Suite designations. (iv) Room numbers. (v) Other available relevant location information for each building. (3) The department shall make grant payments to counties under this section on a schedule as determined by the department.